Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2190.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 35-107 is hereby amended to read as follows: 35-
107. (a) On and after January 1, 2006, The following days are declared to
be legal public holidays and are to be observed as such:
New Year's Day, January 1;
Martin Luther King, Jr. Day, the third Monday in January;
President's Day, the third Monday in February;
Memorial Day, the last Monday in May;
Independence Day, July 4;
Labor Day, the first Monday in September;
Columbus Day, the second Monday in October;
Veterans' Day, the eleventh day in November;
Election Day, the Tuesday following the first Monday in even-
numbered years;
Thanksgiving Day, the fourth Thursday in November;
Christmas Day, December 25.
(b) Any reference in the laws of this state concerning observance of
legal holidays shall on and after January 1, 2006, be considered as a
reference to the day or days prescribed in subsection (a) for the observance
of such legal holiday or holidays.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 35-107 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.